Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
508D

MANDATORY
SELLER DISCLOSURES IN REAL ESTATE

TRANSACTIONS

Section

508D-1 Definitions

508D-2 Applicability

508D-3 Exemptions

508D-3.5 Disclosure of documents; required
documentation

508D-4 Prohibitions on sales of residential real property

508D-4.5 Release or waiver of construction defect

508D-5 Delivery of disclosure statement to buyer;
procedures

508D-6 Later discovered inaccurate information

508D-7 Seller's agent's duties and
responsibilities for

disclosure

508D-8 Excluded facts from the disclosure
statement

508D-9 Good faith and due care in preparing the
disclosure

statement

508D-10 Repealed

508D-10.5 Energy-efficiency consumer information in
sale or lease

of real property

508D-11 Disclosure form

508D-12 Indication of receipt of disclosure
statement

508D-13 Later material facts

508D-14 Additional disclosure requirements

508D-15 Notification required; ambiguity

508D-16 Remedies; voidable contracts

508D-16.5 Rescission

508D-17 Limitation of actions

508D-18 Alternative dispute resolution

508D-19 Severability

508D-20 Repealed

Cross References

Contractor repair act, see chapter 672E.

Law Journals and Reviews

Seller Beware: New Law Protects Hawai‘i Home Buyers. 18 UH
L. Rev. 981.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next